Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1204
Motorboat, defined.

Motorboat shall mean any watercraft propelled in any respect by machinery, including watercraft temporarily equipped with detachable motors, but shall not include a vessel which has a valid marine document issued by the Bureau of Customs of the United States Government or any federal agency successor thereto.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 4.